Utah statutes.
20A-3-704.   Report by election officer.

(1)  An election officer who operates an election day voting center shall provide the lieutenant governor with the information described in Subsection (2) for the election officer's political subdivision.

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall report to the Government Operations Interim Committee on:

(a)  the number of election day voting centers available;

(b)  the number of voting center ballots cast at an election day voting center;

(c)  the number of voting center ballots not counted because the voter cast a ballot at another location or before election day; and

(d)  any recommendations for amendments to this part.

(3)  The lieutenant governor and an election officer described in this section shall report on the use of an election day voting center during the previous general election before:

(a)  November 1, 2013; and

(b)  November 1, 2015.



Enacted by Chapter 291, 2011 General Session

